Utah statutes.
75-4-302.   Jurisdiction by act of decedent.

In addition to jurisdiction conferred by Section 75-4-301, a foreign personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that his decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately prior to death.

